Missouri, session 2026, HB2365.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 196.990, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 196.990 and 210.225, to read as follows:
196.990. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Administer", the direct application of an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery
system to the body of an individual;
(2) "Authorized entity", any entity or organization at or in connection with which
allergens capable of causing anaphylaxis may be present including, but not limited to,
qualified first responders, as such term is defined in section 321.621, restaurants, recreation
camps, youth sports leagues, child care facilities, amusement parks, and sports arenas.
"Authorized entity" shall not include any public school or public charter school;
(3) "Epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system", a single-use [device] system used
for the [automatic injection] delivery of a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human
body;
(4) "Physician", a physician licensed in this state under chapter 334;
(5) "Provide", the supply of one or more epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery
systems to an individual;
(6) "Self-administration", a person's discretionary use of an epinephrine [auto-
injector] delivery system.
2. A physician may prescribe epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems in the
name of an authorized entity for use in accordance with this section, and pharmacists,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 2365, 2490 & 2249 2
physicians, and other persons authorized to dispense prescription medications may dispense
epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems under a prescription issued in the name of an
authorized entity.
3. An authorized entity may acquire and stock a supply of epinephrine [auto-
injectors] delivery systems under a prescription issued in accordance with this section. Such
epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems shall be stored in a location readily accessible
in an emergency and in accordance with the epinephrine [auto-injector's] delivery system's
instructions for use and any additional requirements established by the department of health
and senior services by rule. An authorized entity shall designate employees or agents who
have completed the training required under this section to be responsible for the storage,
maintenance, and general oversight of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systemsacquired
by the authorized entity.
4. An authorized entity that acquires a supply of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery
systems under a prescription issued in accordance with this section shall ensure that:
(1) Expected epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system users receive training in
recognizing symptoms of severe allergic reactions including anaphylaxis and the use of
epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems from a nationally recognized organization
experienced in training laypersons in emergency health treatment or another entity or person
approved by the department of health and senior services;
(2) All epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems are maintained and stored
according to the epinephrine [auto-injector's] delivery system's instructions for use;
(3) Any person who provides or administers an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery
system to an individual who the person believes in good faith is experiencing anaphylaxis
activates the emergency medical services system as soon as possible; and
(4) A proper review of all situations in which an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery
system is used to render emergency care is conducted.
5. Any authorized entity that acquires a supply of epinephrine [auto-injectors]
delivery systems under a prescription issued in accordance with this section shall notify the
emergency communications district or the ambulance dispatch center of the primary provider
of emergency medical services where the epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systemsare to
be located within the entity's facility.
6. No person shall provide or administer an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery
system to any individual who is under eighteen years of age without the verbal consent of a
parent or guardian who is present at the time when provision or administration of the
epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system is needed. Provided, however, that a person may
provide or administer an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system to such an individual
without the consent of a parent or guardian if the parent or guardian is not physically present

HCS HBs 2365, 2490 & 2249 3
and the person reasonably believes the individual shall be in imminent danger without the
provision or administration of the epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system.
7. The following persons and entities shall not be liable for any injuries or related
damages that result from the administration or self-administration of an epinephrine [auto-
injector] delivery system in accordance with this section that may constitute ordinary
negligence:
(1) An authorized entity that possesses and makes available epinephrine [auto-
injectors] delivery systems and its employees, agents, and other trained persons;
(2) Any person who uses an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system made
available under this section;
(3) A physician that prescribes epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems to an
authorized entity; or
(4) Any person or entity that conducts the training described in this section.

Such immunity does not apply to acts or omissions constituting a reckless disregard for the
safety of others or willful or wanton conduct. The administration of an epinephrine [auto-
injector] delivery system in accordance with this section shall not be considered the practice
of medicine. The immunity from liability provided under this subsection is in addition to and
not in lieu of that provided under section 537.037. An authorized entity located in this state
shall not be liable for any injuries or related damages that result from the provision or
administration of an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system by its employees or agents
outside of this state if the entity or its employee or agent is not liable for such injuries or
related damages under the laws of the state in which such provision or administration
occurred. No trained person who is in compliance with this section and who in good faith and
exercising reasonable care fails to administer an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system
shall be liable for such failure.
8. All basic life support ambulances and stretcher vans operated in the state shall be
equipped with epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems and be staffed by at least one
individual trained in the use of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems.
9. The provisions of this section shall apply in all counties within the state and any
city not within a county.
10. Nothing in this section shall be construed as superseding the provisions of section
167.630.
210.225. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as "Elijah's Law".
2. (1) Before July 1, 2028, each licensed child care provider shall adopt a policy
on allergy prevention and response with priority given to addressing potentially deadly

HCS HBs 2365, 2490 & 2249 4
food-borne allergies. Such policy shall contain, but shall not be limited to, the following
elements:
(a) Distinguishing between building-wide, room-level, and individual approaches
to allergy prevention and management;
(b) Providing an age-appropriate response to building-level and room-level
allergy education and prevention;
(c) Describing the role of child care facility staff in determining how to manage
an allergy problem, whether through a plan prepared for a child under Section 504 of
the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, for a child with an allergy that has been
determined to be a disability, an individualized health plan for a child who has an
allergy that is not disabling, or another allergy management plan;
(d) Describing the role of other children and parents in cooperating to prevent
and mitigate allergies;
(e) Addressing confidentiality issues involved with sharing medical information,
including specifying when parental permission is required to make medical information
available; and
(f) Coordinating with the department of elementary and secondary education,
local health authorities, and other appropriate entities to ensure efficient promulgation
of accurate information and to ensure that existing child care facility safety and
environmental policies do not conflict.
(2) Such policies may contain information from or links to child care facility
allergy prevention information furnished by the Food Allergy & Anaphylaxis Network
or equivalent organization with a medical advisory board that has allergy specialists.
3. The department of elementary and secondary education shall, in cooperation
with any appropriate professional association, develop a model policy or policies before
July 1, 2027.
✔